District of Columbia statutes.
16-313

Child as including adopted person.

In the District, “child” or its equivalent in a deed, grant, will, or other written instrument includes an adopted person, unless the contrary plainly appears by the terms thereof, whether the instrument was executed before or after the entry of the interlocutory decree of adoption, if any, or before or after the final decree of adoption became effective.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 541, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-313.
1973 Ed., § 16-313.